Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.110

Publication of Washington State Register—Rule-making authority.

The statute law committee, in addition to the other responsibilities enumerated in this chapter, shall publish the Washington State Register as created in RCW 34.08.020. The statute law committee or the code reviser may adopt rules as are necessary for the effective operation of this service. The statute law committee, in its discretion, may publish the Washington State Register exclusively by electronic means on the code reviser website if it determines that public access to the Washington State Register is not substantially diminished. If the statute law committee publishes the Washington State Register exclusively by electronic means on the code reviser website, the electronic copy posted on the code reviser website shall be considered the official copy of the Washington State Register.

The code reviser shall provide a paper copy of any issue of the register or any register filing upon request. The code reviser may charge a reasonable fee for printing and mailing the paper copy.

[ 2007 c 456 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 240: See RCW 34.08.905.